Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2008
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 36.